Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 4. Unification of Municipalities.

Sec. 29.06.190.
Unification of municipalities authorized.

A borough and all cities in the borough may unite to form a single unit of home rule government by complying with AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.410

.

An area that is not incorporated as a borough, including any cities in the area, may incorporate as a unified municipality under AS

29.05.031

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 19 ch 58 SLA 1994)

Sec. 29.06.200.
Unification petition.

Formation of a charter commission to prepare a unification charter shall be proposed by resolution of the assembly or by petition. The question of formation of a charter commission may be submitted to the voters not more often than once every 24 months.

An assembly, a council, or a person living in the area proposed for unification may initiate a unification petition.

In a general law borough, a unification petition shall be prepared by the borough clerk upon receipt of an application meeting the requirements of AS

29.26.110

, except that instead of containing an ordinance or resolution the application shall contain the question under AS

29.06.210(a)

. The petition shall be prepared in accordance with AS

29.26.120

, except material required under (a)(1) and (2) of that section shall be replaced with the question under AS

29.06.210(a)

. The signature requirements of AS

29.26.130(a)

, (c), and (d) apply to a unification petition. The completed petition shall be submitted to the clerk who shall deliver it to the assembly with a report of the number of valid signatures determined by the clerk to be on the petition.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.06.210.
Petition requirements.

A unification petition shall read:

The petition shall be signed by at least

the number of voters residing outside all home rule and first class cities in the borough equal to 25 percent of the votes cast in that area in the last regular borough election; and

the number of voters residing in each home rule and first class city in the borough equal to 25 percent of the votes cast in each of these cities in the last regular borough election.

“PETITION FOR ELECTION OF CHARTER COMMISSION TO PROPOSE UNIFICATION CHARTER. We, the undersigned, qualified voters of the borough do hereby petition that the following proposition be placed before the voters as provided by law: ‘Shall a charter commission be formed (and charter commission members be elected as elsewhere provided on this ballot) to prepare, adopt, and submit to the voters for their approval or rejection a proposed charter uniting the borough and all cities within it as a single unit of home rule government having the powers, duties and functions of a unified municipality as authorized by law? Yes [ ] No [ ]’

Inside First Outside First Class or Class or Signature Address Home Rule City [ ] Home Rule City [ ]”

Click to view

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.06.220.
Review of petition.

The assembly shall review a unification petition within 15 days to determine whether it complies with AS

29.06.210

. If the petition does not meet the designated requirements, it shall be immediately returned to the person who initiated the petition with a statement indicating which requirements have not been satisfied.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.230.
Duties of charter commission.

The charter commission shall prepare, adopt, and submit to the voters for approval or rejection a proposed home rule charter for the area to be unified.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.240.
Composition of charter commission.

The charter commission shall consist of 11 voters, three of whom are residents elected at large from the borough and eight of whom, proportionate to the population as determined by the department, are

residents of and elected from the area outside all home rule and first class cities in the borough; or

residents of and elected from home rule or first class cities in the borough.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.250.
Charter commission nominations.

If the assembly determines that a unification petition meets the requirements of AS

29.06.210

, or the assembly by its resolution proposes an election on formation of a charter commission, the assembly shall issue a call for the nomination of commission candidates, specifying the filing deadline and the procedure for making nominations.

Charter commission candidates shall be nominated by petition signed by at least 50 voters of the area from which the candidate seeks election, or by a number of voters from that area equal to at least 10 percent of the number of votes cast from that area in the last regular borough election, whichever is less.

Nomination petitions shall be filed with the borough clerk at least 30 days after notice of the call for nominations has been given and on or before a date fixed by the assembly.

If at least one nomination of a qualified charter commission candidate for each available seat is not filed, the unification petition or resolution to propose formation of a charter commission is void and an election on the question may not be held.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.260.
Qualifications of candidates.

A person is eligible to be nominated as a candidate for the charter commission if that person is a voter of the area from which election is sought and has been a voter of the area for at least one year immediately preceding the date the nomination petition is filed.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.270.
Election of charter commission.

After receipt of a valid unification petition or adoption of an assembly resolution to propose formation of a charter commission, the assembly shall submit to the voters the question of whether a charter commission shall be formed to prepare a proposed unification charter. The vote shall be held at the next regular borough election scheduled at least 90 days after receipt of the petition or adoption of the resolution. The ballot shall be worded exactly as in AS

29.06.210(a)

.

The election of charter commission members shall take place at the same time as the election on the question of formation of the commission.

All costs incurred in conducting an election under AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.410

shall be paid by the borough.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.280.
Requirements for approval of formation and election of charter commission.

The votes on the question of formation of a charter commission shall be tabulated in separate classifications. If the question is approved by majority vote in each home rule and first class city in the borough and by a majority vote in the area of the borough outside of all home rule or first class cities, the question is approved. If the question is not approved by majority vote in each home rule and first class city, a favorable vote by at least 55 percent of all the voters voting on the question in home rule and first class cities and by a majority of the voters outside those cities constitutes approval of the question.

If formation of a charter commission is approved, the candidates who received the highest number of votes from their respective areas shall serve as members of the commission.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.06.290.
Charter commission organization and procedure.

The charter commission shall hold its first meeting within 30 days after certification of its election. The commission shall elect from among its members a chairman and a deputy chairman.

A majority of the total membership of the charter commission constitutes a quorum. A decision of the commission is not valid or binding unless approved by the number of members necessary to constitute a quorum.

The charter commission may elect other officials from among its membership, adopt rules governing its procedures that are consistent with AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.410

and hire and discharge employees.

Meetings of the charter commission shall be open to the public at all times. A journal of commission proceedings shall be kept and made available for public inspection at the borough office.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.300.
Vacancies.

Vacancies on the charter commission shall be filled by a majority vote of the commission, except the assembly shall appoint members to fill vacancies if, after a proposed charter is rejected by the voters, more than one-half of the members resign.

A person who fills a vacancy on the charter commission must be a voter of the same area as the person succeeded and must have been a voter of that area for at least one year immediately preceding the date the vacancy is filled.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.310.
Per diem.

The assembly may grant a per diem allowance to members of the charter commission and may reimburse the members for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties prescribed by AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.410

.
Costs, fees, and other expenses incurred by the commission are a debt of the borough and shall be paid upon proper verification.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.320.
Charter provisions.

The charter must include

provision for

the adjustment of existing bonded indebtedness and other obligations in a manner that will assure a fair and equitable burden of taxation for debt service, subject to AS

29.06.380

;

the establishment of service areas;

if election of members of the governing body is not areawide, the establishment of districts for the election of members of the governing body of the proposed unified municipality and procedures by which to reapportion the election districts;

the reapportionment of districts if they are established;

nonpartisan government, and the selection, organization, authority, and responsibilities of the governing body and its executive and administrator;

the transfer or other disposition of property and other rights, claims, assets, and franchises of the municipalities to be unified under the charter;

the exercise of the rights of initiative and referendum in accordance with AS

29.10.030

;

amending the charter in accordance with AS

29.10.100

;

the date on which the charter, if approved at the charter election, is effective;

designation of the proposed unified municipality’s official name; and

other charter provisions that may be included in a home rule charter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.330.
Public hearings.

Both before and after drafting the proposed home rule charter, the charter commission shall hold a public hearing in each area represented on the assembly.
Other public hearings may be held by the commission as it considers necessary.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.340.
Filing of proposed charter.

Upon the adoption of a proposed home rule charter by the charter commission, the charter shall be signed by at least a majority of the total membership of the commission and shall be filed with the borough clerk.
A copy of the charter with signatures affixed shall also be filed with the clerk of each city in the borough.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.350.
Publication and posting of proposed charter.

Within 10 days after filing the proposed home rule charter, the borough clerk shall have it published.
In addition, the clerk shall have a copy of the proposed charter posted in at least three public places in each city and each unincorporated community in the borough.
Copies of the proposed charter shall be made available by the assembly to the public at both the office of the borough clerk and the office of the clerk of each city in the borough.
The clerk shall have notice of the publication, posting, and availability of the proposed charter published.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.360.
Election on charter.

The proposed home rule charter adopted by the charter commission shall be submitted to the voters at a borough election held within 60 days of the date of publication and posting of the proposed charter. The borough clerk shall prepare the ballots for use in the election and shall give notice of the election by radio and television in a manner intended to apprise the entire borough population of the election. The election shall be conducted under procedures applicable to regular elections.

A person who is a voter of the borough may vote in the election on the proposed charter.

If the charter is approved by a majority of the votes in each home rule and first class city in the borough and the charter is approved by a majority of all the votes in the area of the borough outside all home rule or first class cities, the charter is ratified. If the charter is not approved by a majority of the votes in each home rule and first class city, the charter is ratified only if at least 55 percent of all the voters voting on the question in home rule and first class cities approve it and if a majority of the voters outside those cities approve it. If the charter is ratified, election results shall be certified to the commission and two copies of the charter shall be filed with

the lieutenant governor;

the department;

the district recorder for the area of the borough;

the clerk of the borough;

the clerk of each city in the borough.

If a proposed charter is rejected, the charter commission shall prepare, adopt, and submit another proposed charter to the voters at a borough election held within one year after the date of the first charter election. If the second proposed charter is also rejected, the charter commission shall be dissolved and the question of unification shall be treated as if it had never been proposed or approved.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1989)

Sec. 29.06.370.
Effect of the charter after ratification.

Upon ratification, the home rule charter of a unified municipality operates to dissolve all municipalities in the area unified in accordance with the charter.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.380.
Succession to assets and liabilities; bonded indebtedness.

A unified municipality shall succeed to all the assets and liabilities of the municipalities it unified.
A bonded indebtedness or other debt incurred before unification remains the tax obligation of the area that contracted the debt, except that by ordinance the tax obligation may be assumed by a larger area if the governing body determines that the asset for which the bonded indebtedness or other debt was incurred benefited the larger area before unification, or benefits the larger area after unification. However, bonded indebtedness or other debt for sewage collection systems, water distribution systems, and streets, even if determined to be benefiting a larger area than that which incurred the debt, remains the tax obligation of the area that incurred the debt.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.390.
Transition.

Within two years after ratification of the home rule charter, the unified municipality shall revise, repeal, or reaffirm all municipal ordinances, resolutions, and orders in effect in the area of the unified municipality on the date of unification. Each ordinance, resolution, regulation, or order in effect on the date of unification remains in effect until superseded by action of the unified municipality.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.400.
Right to state and federal aid.

All provisions of law authorizing aid from the state or federal government to a former municipality that was in the area of a unified municipality remain in effect after unification.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.410.
Powers of a unified municipality.

A municipality unified under AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.410

has all powers

not prohibited by law or charter; and

granted to a home rule borough.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.06.420.
Application.

AS

29.06.190

—

29.06.420

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)